Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.24, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.24. A. Upon full implementation of the Oklahoma
Teacher and Leader Effectiveness Evaluation System (TLE) as set
forth in Section 6-101.10 of this title, when a teacher receives a
rating as measured pursuant to the TLE as set forth in Section 6-
101.16 of this title that may lead to a recommendation for the
dismissal or nonreemployment of the teacher or when an administrator
identifies poor performance or conduct that the administrator
believes may lead to a recommendation for the dismissal or
nonreemployment of the teacher, the administrator shall:

Req. No. 11273 Page 1

CORRECTED
1. Admonish the teacher, in writing, and make a reasonable
effort to assist the teacher in correcting the poor performance or
conduct; and
2. Establish a reasonable time for improvement, not to exceed
two (2) months, taking into consideration the rating on the
evaluation or the nature and gravity of the performance or conduct.
B. If the teacher does not correct the poor performance or
conduct cited in the admonition within the time specified, the
administrator shall make a recommendation to the superintendent of
the school district for the dismissal or nonreemployment of the
teacher.
C. Whenever a member of the board of education, superintendent,
or other administrator identifies poor performance or conduct that
may lead to a recommendation for dismissal or nonreemployment of a
teacher within the district, the administrator who has
responsibility for evaluation of the teacher shall be informed, and
that administrator shall comply with the procedures set forth in
this section. If the administrator fails or refuses to admonish the
teacher within ten (10) days after being so informed by the board,
superintendent, or other administrator, such board, superintendent
or other administrator shall admonish the teacher pursuant to the
provisions of this section.
D. 1. Repeated negligence in performance of duty, willful
neglect of duty, incompetency mental or physical abuse of a child,
Req. No. 11273 Page 2

CORRECTED
any reason involving moral turpitude, or abandonment of contract
shall be a sufficient basis for a recommendation for dismissal or
nonreemployment of a teacher without complying with the procedures
set forth in this section.
2. Incompetency, instructional ineffectiveness or
unsatisfactory teaching performance, for a career teacher, or any
cause related to inadequate teaching performance for a probationary
teacher, shall not be a basis for a recommendation to dismiss or not
reemploy for dismissal or nonreemployment of a teacher unless and
until the provisions of this section have been complied with.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11273 AQH 12/16/24







Req. No. 11273 Page 3